Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. General Provisions
38-35-118.
Homestead, how conveyed - claimant insane.

Except as provided in section 38-41-202 (3), to convey or encumber homesteaded property, the husband and wife, if the owner thereof is married, shall execute the conveyance or encumbrance. Such conveyance or encumbrance may be by one instrument or separate instruments which may be acknowledged in the manner provided by articles 30 to 44 of this title. A recital in any recorded conveyance or encumbrance of real property of the marital status of the party executing the same or that the property is or is not occupied as a home by the owner thereof or his family shall be prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated. If the owner of the homesteaded property and a person of the opposite sex, both bearing the same surname, join in the conveyance or encumbrance thereof, the identity of surnames shall be prima facie evidence that such parties are husband and wife for the purposes of this article.

A homestead exemption may be released by an instrument in writing, signed by the party who could convey said property. A statement contained in a mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument creating a lien waiving or releasing the homestead shall be construed only as a subordination of the homestead to such mortgage, deed of trust, or other lien.

If the homestead is claimed by a person who at the time of conveyance or encumbrance thereof is insane or mentally incompetent and for whose estate there is a conservator duly appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction as provided by the laws of Colorado, the court having jurisdiction of the estate of such insane or mentally incompetent person, wherever it appears to be in the best interests of the ward, may by order empower such conservator to convey or encumber the homestead of such insane or mentally incompetent person.

If such insane or mentally incompetent person is married, the conservator of the estate of the insane or mentally incompetent spouse, when so authorized by court to convey or encumber the homestead of his ward, may do so by a single instrument in writing jointly executed by such conservator and the other spouse, not insane, or such conservator may convey or encumber such homestead of his ward by a separate instrument.

In all cases wherein the court orders a conveyance or encumbrance of a homestead claimed by an insane or mentally incompetent person, the actual consideration for the conveyance or encumbrance of such homestead, whether in money or equivalent property, but not to exceed the sum of five thousand dollars in amount or value, shall be delivered to and accounted for by the conservator of the estate of such insane or mentally incompetent person and such funds or property coming into the possession of the conservator from such sources shall not be liable for the debts of the insane or mentally incompetent person.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 592, § 13.

CSA:

C. 40, § 119.

L. 47:

P. 359, § 1.

L. 53:

P. 414, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-18.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1719, § 1, effective May 27.

Cross references:

For homestead exemptions, see part 2 of article 41 of this title; for appointment of a conservator for a person under disability or a minor, see part 4 of article 14 of title 15.

38-35-119.
Release not a conveyance.

All instruments executed for the purpose of releasing any lien or encumbrance against real property shall be considered only as discharging and canceling such lien or encumbrance. No such release shall convey to any person, except the record owner of the property, any right, title, or interest in the property. Words of conveyance used in any such release shall be construed only as provided in this section.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 593, § 14.

CSA:

C. 40, § 120.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-19.

38-35-120.
Record of first and last parcels includes intervening parcels.

All instruments wherein the parcels of property affected are not separately enumerated or listed but are described as being from one numbered, lettered, or designated parcel to another shall be construed as including the first and last designated parcels and also the intervening parcels unless a contrary intention is expressly and clearly set forth in the instrument.

History.

Source:
L. 27:

P. 593, § 15.

CSA:

C. 40, § 121.

CRS 53:

§ 118-6-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-6-20.

38-35-121.
Conveyance or reservation of a mineral interest - geothermal resources.

As respects instruments executed prior to May 17, 1974, which convey title to real property or an interest therein, it shall be presumed that reference to minerals or mineral rights does not include geothermal resources unless geothermal resources are specifically mentioned. As respects such instruments executed on and after May 17, 1974, reference to minerals or mineral rights shall not include geothermal resources unless specifically mentioned.

History.

Source:
L. 74:

Entire section added, p. 316, § 8, effective May 17.

38-35-122.
Inclusion of street address and assessor information with legal description - effect - validity of recording - interests in property - legislative declaration.

All documents of title relating to real property, including instruments creating a lien on real property, except mechanics’ liens and judgment liens, shall include as an aid to identification, immediately preceding or following the legal description of the property, the street address or comparable identifying numbers, if such address or numbers are displayed on the property or any building thereon.

Preparers of conveyance documents may include as an aid to identification, immediately preceding or following the legal description of the property, the assessor’s schedule number or parcel number.

Should any variance or ambiguity result from the inclusion of a street address, identifying number, or assessor’s schedule number or parcel number on a document, the legal description of the property shall govern.

The fact that a document of title does not contain an address, identifying number, or assessor’s schedule number or parcel number shall not render the document ineffective nor render title unmarketable if the legal description appears therein.

(3.5)

Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that in In re Rivera, 2012 CO 43 (also referred to as Sender v. Cygan),the Colorado supreme court held that a recorded deed of trust that completely omits a legal description is defectively recorded and cannot provide constructive notice to a subsequent purchaser of another party’s security interest in the property.

By enacting House Bill 13-1307, enacted in 2013, it is the intent of the general assembly to clarify, for parties that currently have an interest in real property or that will acquire an interest in real property in the future, that, notwithstanding the holdings and conclusions in In re Rivera, the fact that a recorded document omits a legal description is not, by itself and without regard to the totality of the circumstances, determinative of whether the document:

Is valid against any person obtaining rights in the real property; or

Is valid or invalid.

The fact that a document purporting to affect title to real property, whether recorded before or after August 7, 2013, does not contain or include a legal description of the real property may, in the totality of the circumstances, but does not necessarily:

Render defective, invalid, or void the recording of the document in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where the real property is situated; or

Determine whether the document is valid against a person obtaining rights in the real property.

The fact that a document purporting to affect title to real property, whether executed before or after August 7, 2013, does not contain or include a legal description of the real property may, in the totality of the circumstances, but does not necessarily, determine whether the document is valid or invalid.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1436, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 981, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 30, § 1, effective March 9.

L. 2013:

(3.5), (4), and (5) added,(HB 13-1307), ch. 319, p. 1737, § 1, effective August 7.

38-35-123.
Liens - notice - current address.

Any instrument which creates a lien on real property, except mechanics’ liens, when recorded in the office of the county clerk and recorder of the county where such real property is situated shall include on its face the current mailing address of the lienor and lienee when such instrument is recorded. In the case of judgment liens, such address shall be placed on the document by the lienor.

Failure to comply with this section shall not affect the validity of the recording of the instrument or of the instrument itself.

History.

Source:
L. 84:

Entire section added, p. 981, § 2, effective July 1.

38-35-124.
Requirements upon satisfaction of indebtedness.

Except as provided in articles 22 and 23 of this title or as otherwise provided in this section, when all indebtedness, whether absolute or contingent, secured by a lien on real property has been satisfied, unless the debtor requests in writing that the lien not be released, the creditor or holder of the indebtedness shall, within ninety days after the satisfaction of the indebtedness and receipt from the debtor of the reasonable costs of procuring and recording the release documents, record with the appropriate clerk and recorder the documents necessary to release or satisfy the lien of record or, in the case of an indebtedness secured by a deed of trust to a public trustee, file with the public trustee the documents required for a release as prescribed by section 38-39-102.

If the debtor requests in writing that the lien be released, or fails to request in writing that the lien not be released, then the debtor’s request or the actual release cancels any obligations on the part of the creditor or holder to make any further loan or advance that would be secured by the lien. If the person satisfying the indebtedness requests in writing delivery to him or her of the canceled instruments of indebtedness at the time of satisfaction, the creditor or holder is relieved of any further obligation or liability under this section after the delivery has been completed.

Upon satisfaction of the indebtedness, the creditor or holder shall return to the person satisfying the indebtedness all papers and personal property of the debtor that have been held by the creditor or holder in connection with the indebtedness. A creditor or holder who fails to comply with this section is liable to the owner of the real property encumbered by such indebtedness and to any other person liable on such indebtedness for all actual economic loss incurred enforcing the rights provided under this section, including reasonable attorney fees and costs.

For indebtedness secured by a lien on real property where the ability of a debtor to draw upon a line of credit continues notwithstanding that all amounts outstanding under the line of credit have been paid in full, any lien on real property securing that line of credit continues, and no lien release under this section is required, until the line of credit expires and all indebtedness, whether absolute or contingent, has been satisfied unless, before expiration of the line of credit, all outstanding indebtedness is satisfied and the debtor relinquishes in writing all right to make any further draw upon the line of credit.

The debtor relinquishes all right to make a further draw by either requesting in writing that the line of credit be closed by the creditor or by written notification by the debtor or debtor’s designee that the real property is being conveyed upon payment of all indebtedness. Upon satisfaction of all indebtedness in connection with the conveyance of the real property and notice to the creditor or holder of the conveyance, the creditor or holder shall terminate the line of credit, record the release of the lien on real property, or in the case of a deed of trust, file with the public trustee the documents required for release, and return all papers and personal property as set forth in this section.

History.

Source:
L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1338, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 1920, § 48, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1331, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended,(HB 16-1356), ch. 348, p. 1418, § 1, effective August 10.

38-35-124.5.
Effect of written payoff statement.

Any person or entity providing closing and settlement services for a real estate transaction and to whom a payoff statement is addressed shall be entitled to reasonably rely on the amounts that are set forth in such payoff statement for the time frame set forth therein and shall not be liable to the creditor or holder of the indebtedness or its agent for any omitted amounts, unless a written amendment is received by such person or entity prior to the closing of the transaction. Upon payment to the creditor or holder of the amounts stated in the written payoff statement, as may be amended, such creditor or holder shall be required to comply with the release provisions of section 38-35-124.

Any creditor or holder of the indebtedness who fails to comply with the release provisions of section 38-35-124 as required by subsection (1) of this section shall be liable to those persons or entities to whom the written payoff statement was addressed for any actual economic loss suffered by such persons or entities, including reasonable attorney fees and costs in enforcing the provisions of this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, in the event of an error in the written payoff statement provided by a creditor or holder of the indebtedness or its agent, the creditor shall retain any remedies, legal or equitable, to collect directly against the obligor any unsecured additional amounts determined to be outstanding.

History.

Source:
L. 2002:

Entire section added, p. 1332, § 3, effective July 1.

38-35-125.
Closing and settlement services - disbursement of funds.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Available for immediate withdrawal as a matter of right” includes funds transferred by any of the following means:

Any wire transfer;

Any certified check, cashier’s check, teller’s check, or any other instrument as defined by federal regulation CC, 12 CFR 229.10 (c).

“Closing and settlement services” means those services which benefit the parties to the sale, lease, encumbrance, mortgage, or creation of a secured interest in and to real property and the receipt and disbursement of money in connection with any sale, lease, encumbrance, mortgage, or deed of trust.

“Financial institution” means an entity that is authorized under the laws of this state, another state, or the United States to make loans and receive deposits and has its deposits insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or its successor or the national credit union share insurance fund.

(Deleted by amendment,

L

. 2004, p. 1206, § 83, effective August 4, 2004.)

No person or entity that provides closing and settlement services for a real estate transaction shall disburse funds as a part of such services until those funds have been received and are either: Available for immediate withdrawal as a matter of right from the financial institution in which the funds have been deposited; or available for immediate withdrawal as a consequence of an agreement of a financial institution in which the funds are to be deposited or a financial institution upon which the funds are to be drawn. Any such agreement shall be made with or for the benefit of the person or entity providing closing and settlement services for a real estate transaction. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection (2), the person or entity providing closing and settlement services may advance funds, not to exceed five hundred dollars, on behalf of interested parties for the transaction to pay incidental fees for such items as tax certificates and recording costs or to cover minor changes in the closing adjustments.

The requirements of subsection (2) of this section may be waived by the seller in the real estate transaction if:

It is specified as part of written closing instructions in advance of closing that the seller waives the requirements set forth in subsection (2) of this section and that the person or entity conducting the closing, unless such person or entity is the seller, is not to handle the receipt and disbursement of funds as part of the closing; and

Any holder of a lien encumbering the property up to the time of closing agrees, in writing, to such waiver and further agrees, in writing, to release such lien immediately upon receipt of a check from the closing drawn in the amount of the outstanding indebtedness secured by such lien. Such an agreement shall obligate the lienholder to release such lien regardless of whether the payoff check received has been or will be honored.

Any seller who so requests as part of written closing instructions in advance of closing shall be entitled to receive the proceeds of closing in a cashier’s check or in funds electronically transferred to an account specified by the seller.

Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall be deemed a deceptive trade practice, as provided in section 6-1-105 (1)(v), C.R.S., and the attorney general or a district attorney may apply to the appropriate district court of this state for an order to effect the purposes of this section.

History.

Source:
L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 1259, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1)(c) added, p. 1445, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 2004:

(1)(b) amended, p. 156, § 73, effective July 1; (1) amended, p. 1206, § 83, effective August 4.

Editor’s note:

Amendments to subsection (1) by Senate Bill 04-239 and House Bill 04-1126 were harmonized.

38-35-126.
Contract for deed - escrow of tax moneys - written notice.

Parties entering into a contract for deed to real property shall designate the public trustee of the county where the real property is located to act as escrow agent for moneys paid or to be paid by the purchaser to meet the property tax obligations on the real property, including the seller’s credit at closing for the current year’s property taxes and periodic property tax payments, which the contract shall provide will be made monthly by the purchaser to the public trustee. The purchaser shall be responsible for payment to the public trustee of the escrow fee pursuant to section 38-37-104 (1)(d). Once each year during the month of April, upon notice from the county treasurer, the public trustee shall, to the extent funds are on deposit in the escrow account, transfer sufficient funds from the escrow account to the county treasurer for payment of property taxes on the real property for the prior taxable year. The public trustee shall continue as escrow agent for tax moneys collected on the real property until the deed to the real property is delivered to the purchaser and recorded. At the time of delivery, the public trustee shall release to the purchaser any moneys remaining in the escrow account and the receipts for all property taxes paid on the property by the public trustee. If the public trustee determines that the escrow is no longer necessary, the public trustee may terminate the escrow account. The public trustee shall notify the county treasurer of the termination and shall transfer any moneys held in escrow to the county treasurer for payment of property taxes in accordance with section 39-10-104.5, C.R.S. Any amount so transferred by the public trustee shall be subtracted from the amount of property tax payable on the real property at the time annual property taxes for the current or subsequent taxable years are due. Upon termination of the escrow account, any amount not accepted by the county treasurer upon transfer shall be returned by the public trustee to the person holding title to the real property that is the subject of the contract for deed to real property.

For the purposes of this section, a “contract for deed to real property” means a contract for the sale of real property which provides that the purchaser shall assume possession of the real property and the rights and responsibilities of ownership of the real property but that the deed to such real property will not be delivered to the purchaser for at least one hundred eighty days following the latest execution date on the contract for deed to real property and not until the purchaser has met certain conditions such as payment of the full contract price or a specified portion thereof. “Contract for deed to real property” includes installment land contracts.

The public trustee shall deposit tax moneys received pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) in an escrow account opened for such purpose in one or more financial institutions which are in compliance with and qualified and defined in article 10.5 of title 11, C.R.S. Moneys from more than one transaction may be commingled in one account, to be accounted for separately. If the escrow account opened by the public trustee under the provisions of this subsection (1) bears interest, such interest shall be retained by the public trustee to defray expenses arising from the administration of such escrow account.

A public trustee may designate an alternate to act as escrow agent on any contract for deed to real property in which the public trustee is designated as escrow agent pursuant to the provisions of this section; except that such alternate shall not be a party to the contract for deed to real property. Such designation shall be made by sending written notification of such designation to the parties to such contract and to the county treasurer. Such notice shall include the name and legal address of the designated alternate and the date such designated alternate shall assume the duties of escrow agent. Such designated alternate shall have all of the duties and powers of the public trustee to act as escrow agent on a contract for deed to real property as stated in this section. In the event that the public trustee designates an alternate to serve as escrow agent, the purchaser shall pay to the designated alternate the escrow fee as stated in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

Within ninety days of executing and delivering a contract for deed to real property, the seller shall file with the county treasurer of the county wherein the real property is located a written notice of transfer by contract for deed to real property. Such notice shall not operate to convey title. Such notice shall include the name and legal address of the seller, the name and legal address of the purchaser, a legal description of the real property, the date upon which the contract for deed to real property was executed and delivered, and the date or conditions upon which the deed to the real property will be delivered to the purchaser, absent default. In addition, within ninety days of executing and delivering the contract for deed to real property, the seller shall file a real estate transfer declaration with the county assessor of the county wherein the property is located, pursuant to the provisions of section 39-14-102, C.R.S.

The buyer shall have the option of voiding any contract for deed to real property which fails to designate the public trustee as escrow agent for deposit of property tax moneys or for which no written notice is filed with the county treasurer’s office or the county assessor’s office. Upon voidance of such contract, the buyer shall be entitled to the return of all payments made on the contract, with statutory interest as defined in section 5-12-102, C.R.S., and reasonable attorney fees and costs. This avoidance right shall expire on the date seven years after the latest execution date on the contract for deed to real property unless exercised prior to such date.

The provisions of subsections (1) and (3) of this section shall not apply to the parties to a contract for deed to real property so long as the seller complies with the requirements of subsection (2) of this section, so long as the real property which is the subject of such contract for deed to real property is not subdivided into parcels which are smaller than one acre, and so long as the seller pays the annual property tax obligations on the real property which is the subject of such contract for deed to real property or submits a bond or an irrevocable letter of credit in the amount of the taxes due on such real property to the county treasurer, either of which shall be immediately payable to such county treasurer upon default. Payment of such property taxes or submittal of such bond or irrevocable letter of credit shall be made within thirty days of mailing of the notice of taxes due from the county treasurer and prior to seeking reimbursement from the purchaser.

Repealed.

History.

Source:
L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 2098, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(4) added, p. 509, § 1, effective April 26; (5) added, p. 1743, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(5) repealed, p. 1645, § 78, effective May 31.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1479, § 36, effective January 1, 2008.

Editor’s note:

The effective date for amendments made to subsection (1)(a) by chapter 305, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2006, was changed from July 1, 2007, to January 1, 2008, by section 27 of chapter 404, Session

L

aws of Colorado 2007. (See L. 2007, p. 1849.)